Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-411
Benefit officer; powers and duties.

(1) A benefit corporation
may have an officer designated the benefit officer.

(2) A benefit officer shall
have:

(a)
The powers and duties relating to the purpose of the corporation to create
general public benefit or specific public benefit provided:

(i) By the bylaws; or

(ii) Absent controlling provisions
in the bylaws, by resolutions or orders of the board of directors; and

(b) The duty to prepare the
annual benefit report required by section 21-413.

Laws 2014, LB751, § 11.